Washington statutes.
RCW 35.90.100

Report.

Cities must coordinate with the association of Washington cities to submit a report to the governor; legislative fiscal committees; house local government committee; and the senate agriculture, water, trade and economic development committee by January 1, 2019. The report must:

(1) Provide information about the model ordinance adopted by the cities as required in RCW 35.90.080;

(2) Identify cities that have and have not adopted the mandatory provisions of the model ordinance; and

(3) Incorporate comments from statewide business organizations concerning the process and substance of the model ordinance. Statewide business organizations must be allowed thirty days to submit comments for inclusion in the report.

[ 2017 c 209 s 10.]